Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-331
Assessments; certificate of levy to county clerk; form.

The levy of the tax when so fixed and determined, shall be evidenced and certified by the board of supervisors to the county clerk of each county in which lands of the district are situated, which certificate shall be substantially in the following form:

State of Nebraska,)

)
ss.

County of ........)

To ......................, county clerk of the county:

This is to certify that by virtue of the provisions and terms of sections 31-330 and 31-331, the board of supervisors of (here insert name of drainage district) including lands and property in the counties of ..................... in the State of Nebraska, have determined to and do hereby levy the special tax provided for in such sections on the lands and property situated in your county, described in the following table, in which are (1) the names of owners of the lands and property as they appeared in the decree of the district court organizing the district or as then shown by the deed records of the county, (2) the description of the lands and property opposite the names of the owners, and (3) the amount of the tax levied on each tract of land or piece of property: (here insert table). The tax shall be collected and payable in .................. annual installments, and the amount of each annual installment will be certified to you not later than September 1 in each year. Witness the signature of the chairperson of the board of supervisors, attested by the seal of the district and the signature of the secretary of the board on this .......... day of .......... A.D. 20.... .

......................

......................

Secretary
(Seal)
Chairperson

The county clerk shall file the certificate in his or her office and record the same.

Laws 1907, c. 152, § 3, p. 468;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 8, p. 517;

R.S.1913, § 1826;

C.S.1922, § 1773;

C.S.1929, § 31-430;

R.S.1943, § 31-331;

Laws 1995, LB 589, § 6;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 13.